Illinois, session 104th, HB4944.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 24.5-10 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 5/24.5-10)7    Sec. 24.5-10. Unlawful manufacture, or delivery, or sale. 8Any person, firm, corporation, co-partnership, limited 9liability company, or association, or business, including an 10online retailer, that intentionally manufactures, delivers, or 11possesses, or sells with intent to manufacture, or deliver, 12sell, or otherwise transfer nitrous oxide for any purpose 13prohibited under Section 24.5-5 is guilty of a Class 3 felony.14(Source: P.A. 91-366, eff. 1-1-00.)